Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1134.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5729(a) of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5729. Misbranding of food.(a) General rule.--A food shall be misbranded:* * *(13) If it bears or contains Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9), Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0), Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9), Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6), Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0) or Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0), unless it bears the following warning, in boldface type, on the principle display panel and in a type size no 12345678910111213141516 smaller than the type size used for the "serving size" declaration required by Federal law:WARNING: This product contains synthetic colors, which may have an adverse effect on activity and attention in children.* * *(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "CAS" means the unique accession number assigned by the Chemical Abstracts Service, a division of the American Chemical Society, as of the effective date of this section, to a substance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB1134PN1419 - 2 - 1234567891011